Tennessee, session 114, SB0062.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-246(a), is amended by deleting
subdivision (15).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-252(a), is amended by inserting
the following as a new subdivision:
( ) Council on pensions, created by § 3-9-101;
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0062
000320
- 1 -